Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 7 Relocation of Highways

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets and Bridges § 150.

39A C.J.S. Highways § 112; 40 C.J.S. Highways §§ 180 to 186.

§ 24-7-101.
Subject to city or town election.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state of Wyoming that no state highway or state and federal highway now traversing or passing through any incorporated city or town of the state of Wyoming shall be so moved or relocated in such city or town as to divert the present route of the same in such city or town nor to bypass such city or town except with the express approval of the people thereof.

In any incorporated city or town when the decision is to be made, the proposal to move or relocate a highway shall be submitted at any regular or special election in the municipality to the qualified electors thereof. The ballot question shall set forth a concise and accurate summary of the proposed change and shall permit and direct each voter to vote either “For the Proposed Change” or “Against the Proposed Change”. The election shall be conducted in all respects as any other municipal election. If a majority of those voting are in favor of the proposal to move or relocate the highway, the proposal carries. Otherwise, the proposal fails.

If the majority of the ballots cast in such election in any town or city shall be in favor of the proposed change, as herein provided, then the governing board of such city or town shall proceed to effectuate the same, but if the majority in either case shall oppose such change then such governing board shall have no further jurisdiction or authority to consider or act upon the same; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall prevent the governing board of any city or town wherein, because of congestion of motor vehicle traffic, narrowness of streets, density of fumes, smoke or exhaust, intensity or frequency of unusually loud sounds, or other cause, the passage of motor vehicles consisting of more than one (1) self-propelled unit constitutes a nuisance or an actual danger to health or safety, as determined by such governing board, from establishing a separate route for such multi-unit motor vehicles around such city or town but connecting with public highways at or near the boundaries thereof, by acquiring lands or easements for rights-of-way for such routes, which need not be dedicated to the public nor to the public use but may be laid out as private highways solely for the use of such multi-unit motor vehicles.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-122; Laws 1953, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-80; Laws 1981, ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of electors, see §

22-3-102

.

New highway which diverts traffic from one existing may notalways be considered a bypass. —

The supreme court is unable to glean an intention from the language actually used by the legislature that any new highway which diverts traffic from one already existing is to be considered a bypass. Clearmont v. State Highway Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1960).

Legislature did not simply provide that no city or town should be bypassed.

It provided in plain English and language that cannot be misunderstood that an existing highway in a city or town cannot be moved, relocated or changed so as to bypass such city or town without the choice of the people of the town or city. It failed to mention any new highway if the existing highway is let alone; rather, it is a change from the existing highway to which reference is made in the bypass law. Clearmont v. State Highway Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1960).

Distinction between incorporated and unincorporated citiesand towns not unreasonable. —

While it is not necessary to determine the constitutionality of this section, it is doubtful that the distinction made between incorporated and unincorporated cities and towns is unreasonable. Clearmont v. State Highway Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1960).

This section provides no redress or remedy for a town lying 29 miles from the proposed route of a new federal interstate highway.

Clearmont v. State Highway Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 24-7-102.
Prohibited expenditures.

It is declared to be unlawful for the transportation commission or the department of transportation to expend any monies for the construction of a proposed change or for the acquisition of the necessary right-of-way for the same, until the approval of the governing body of the affected town or city shall have first been obtained as above provided.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 48-123; W.S. 1957, § 24-81; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-7-103.
Application of W.S. 24-1-127, 24-7-101 through 24-7-103.

This enactment shall have no application to the usual and necessary diversion of traffic for purposes of road repair or reconstruction, nor shall it apply to any city having a population of more than twenty thousand (20,000), nor shall the provisions of this act be retroactive from the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 48-124; Laws 1953, ch. 185, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 24-82; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “people at the last preceding federal census” following “twenty thousand (20,000).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 6, makes the act effective from and after passage and approval. Approved March 1, 1950.

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Repealing and severability clauses. —

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 5, provides: “All other acts, or portions thereof, in conflict herewith are hereby repealed insofar as they are in conflict with the purposes herein expressed. If any portion of this enactment be declared unconstitutional the legislature hereby declares that, notwithstanding the same, it is its intention to enact the remaining valid portion thereof.”

Applied

in

Town of Clearmont v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo 1960).

§ 24-7-104.
Connecting roads; construction.

From and after the passage of this act whenever an established state highway is relocated, it shall be the duty of the department of transportation to cause to be constructed a hard-surfaced highway from any city or town of a population of not less than fifty (50) people now on or adjacent to the established highway to the relocated highway by the nearest practicable route.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 51, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-119; W.S. 1957, § 24-83; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1949, ch. 51, was approved February 18, 1949.

§ 24-7-105.
Connecting roads; expense.

The connecting roads from the cities or towns to the relocated highway shall be constructed and maintained by the department of transportation without expense to the county or counties in which the roads are constructed.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 51, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 48-120; W.S. 1957, § 24-84; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-7-106.
Connecting roads; property owners to be furnished approaches.

Adjacent property owners shall be furnished safe, convenient and proper approaches to such relocated or connecting highways, but not beyond the highway right-of-way.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 51, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 48-121; W.S. 1957, § 24-85.